Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 147A Program Development

147A.002.
Department for Local Government — Organization — Commissioner.

The Department for Local Government shall be headed by a commissioner and shall consist of the:

Office of Financial Management and Administration, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for duties including but not limited to local government financial assistance; county budget approval; performance of various recordkeeping requirements for the Commonwealth’s cities, counties, and special districts; provision of administrative support for the state local debt officer and the state local finance officer; administration of the county officials training incentive program set forth in KRS 64.5275; and provision of financial analysis and guidance related to the internal budgetary processes of the Department for Local Government;

Office of Federal Grants, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for the administration of all federal grant programs;

Office of State Grants, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for the administration of all state grant programs, including the Renaissance on Main Program, the area development fund, the body armor program set forth in KRS 16.220, the cemetery fund program, single county coal severance grants, and any state grant programs or individually funded projects awarded by statute or budget;

Office of Legal Services, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for legal services within the Department for Local Government and for its constituencies around the Commonwealth; and

Office of Field Services, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for duties including but not limited to staffing regional offices to assist local governments.

The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, shall appoint necessary deputies, assistants, attorneys, and other employees and shall fix their compensation and authorize payment of their expenses according to law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 70, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 404, § 38, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 12, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 69, § 48, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.003.
Kentucky Infrastructure Authority.

The Kentucky Infrastructure Authority shall be attached to the Department for Local Government for administrative purposes. Office space required by the authority shall be provided by the Department for Local Government.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 19, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 69, § 49, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.004.
Distribution of state and federal planning funds.

The Department for Local Government shall administer distribution of state and federal planning funds to area development districts and shall require by administrative regulation financial and operational reports, audits, and other controls as are necessary to assure compliance with state and federal laws relating to funds received by the area development districts.

The Department for Local Government shall promulgate administrative regulations as will assure statewide coordination of the planning and assistance operations of the area development districts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 71, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 69, § 50, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 66, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.006.
Local Government Advisory Commission established. [Repealed.]

147A.008.
Governor’s advisory council to the office of volunteer services — Appointment — Compensation. [Repealed.]

147A.009.
Division of Flood Control. [Repealed.]

147A.010.
Kentucky program development office established — Administrator. [Repealed.]

147A.011.
Water Resource Development Commission — Duties — Membership — Term — Authority to designate alternate. [Repealed.]

147A.020.
Powers and duties of state local debt officer and state local finance officer.

The state local debt officer and the state local finance officer within the Department for Local Government shall exercise the following administrative functions of the state:

The state local debt officer shall exercise all administrative functions as provided in the county debt act, KRS 66.280 to 66.390, and administrative functions relating to local government bonds as provided in KRS 66.045; and

The state local finance officer shall exercise all administrative functions regarding county and local government budgets, as provided in KRS 68.210 to 68.360.

The state local debt officer shall have the following powers and duties:

To require reports from local governments to enable him to adequately provide the technical and advisory assistance authorized by this section. The reports shall provide the necessary information for a complete file on local government debt, which the state local debt officer shall keep open for public inspection at the Department for Local Government;

To conduct studies in debt management, including ways and means of appraising the terms of alternative bids;

To request assistance and information, which shall be provided by all departments, divisions, boards, bureaus, commissions, and other agencies of state government, to enable the state local debt officer to carry out his duties under this section; and

To compile and publish annually a report which shall include detailed information on local government long-term debt issued and retired during the previous year and outstanding, and other available statistical data on local government finances.

The state local finance officer shall have the following powers and duties:

To coordinate for the Governor the state’s responsibility for, and shall be responsible for liaison with the appropriate state and federal agencies with respect to, general revenue sharing for local government;

To provide technical assistance and information to units of local government on matters including but not limited to fiscal management, purchases, and contracts; and

To conduct training programs to instruct county and other local officials respecting their duties and responsibilities in the collection, expenditure, and management of public moneys subject to their control and jurisdiction.

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 66, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 10; 1978, ch. 155, § 68, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 108, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 295, § 103, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 393, § 48, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 508, § 45, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 53, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 85, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 67, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.021.
Department for Local Government — Powers and duties.

The Department for Local Government shall have the following powers and duties:

To require any reports from local governments that will enable it adequately to provide the technical and advisory assistance authorized by this section;

To encourage, conduct, or participate in training courses in procedures and practices for the benefit of local officials, and in connection therewith, to cooperate with associations of public officials, business and professional organizations, university faculties, or other specialists;

To request assistance and information, which shall be provided by all departments, divisions, boards, bureaus, commissions, and other agencies of state government to enable the Department for Local Government to carry out its duties under this section;

At its discretion, to compile and publish annually a report on local government; and

To administer the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

The Department for Local Government shall coordinate for the Governor the state’s responsibility for, and shall be responsible for liaison with the appropriate state and federal agencies with respect to, the following programs:

Demonstration cities and metropolitan development act as amended with the exception of Title I of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 as amended through 1981;

Farmers Home Administration;

Veterans Administration Act as amended, as it pertains to housing.

The Department for Local Government shall provide technical assistance and information to units of local government, including but not limited to:

Personnel administration;

Ordinances and codes;

Community development;

Appalachian Regional Development Program;

Economic Development Administration Program;

Intergovernmental Personnel Act Program;

Land and Water Conservation Fund Program;

Area Development Fund Program;

Joint Funding Administration Program;

State clearinghouse for A-95 review;

The memorandums of agreement with the area development districts to provide management assistance to local governments; and

The urban development office.

The Department for Local Government shall exercise all of the functions of the state local finance officer provided in KRS Chapters 66, 68, and 131 relating to the control of funds of counties, cities, and other units of local government.

Upon request of the Administrative Office of the Courts, the Department for Local Government shall evaluate the financial condition of any local unit of government selected to participate in a court facilities construction or renovation project under KRS 26A.160 and shall certify to the Administrative Office of the Courts the local unit of government’s ability to participate in the project.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 396, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 183, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 508, § 46, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 54, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 496, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 37, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 47, § 68, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 6, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 40, § 55, effective March 21, 2013; 2019 ch. 119, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

147A.023.
Legislative findings — Department for Local Government to encourage growth of broadband and information technology in state. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 37, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2019 ch. 119, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

147A.025.
Instruction program for county officials.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the Department for Local Government, with the advice and approval of the state local finance officer, annually shall conduct a program to instruct county clerks, sheriffs, jailers, and county treasurers respecting their duties and responsibilities in the collection and expenditure of public moneys, subject to their control and jurisdiction.

The Department for Local Government, with the advice and approval of the state local finance officer, shall establish the content and publish instructional materials essential to implementing this program. Subsequent to every regular and extraordinary session of the General Assembly, the Department for Local Government, with the state local finance officer, shall review and revise, if necessary, the program when it is found not to be consistent with state law.

The Department for Local Government may assess a charge to any person requesting copies of instructional materials published as provided by this section to cover actual costs of printing and handling these materials, except that no county official shall be charged for instructional materials provided for his use. Funds accruing from the sale of instructional materials shall be paid into the State Treasury, and the State Treasurer shall pay these funds into an account of the Department for Local Government to defray the costs of printing and handling these materials.

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government, with the advice and approval of the state local finance officer, may prescribe completion standards for this program, and may, subject to subsection (6) of this section, establish the number, type, and sequence of instructional sessions to be conducted by the Department for Local Government; but the commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall not require the attendance of any county official, nor shall he prescribe any requirement or standard that restricts or impairs a county official or elected candidate in the lawful pursuit or conduct of the office to which he is elected.

The Department for Local Government shall notify in advance each county clerk, sheriff, jailer, and county treasurer respecting instructional session pertinent to his office. Notification shall be by mail, and it shall be posted no later than twenty-one (21) days prior to the instructional session. At a minimum, the notice shall give the date, time, place, and title of the instruction session.

The Department for Local Government shall conduct this program by providing a one (1) day session at various locations throughout this state in order to minimize the travel expenses of those officials attending, provided that the aggregate number of all sessions shall not exceed five (5) during any calendar year. Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the Department for Local Government may commence instruction anytime during a calendar year.

The Department for Local Government shall not conduct a program as provided by this section during any calendar year when a general election is held for every constitutional county office. The Department for Local Government, however, shall commence instruction for the succeeding year within eighty (80) days following said general election.

Every county official who attends an instructional session shall be paid his actual and necessary expenses in attending from the operating funds of his office.

In fulfilling the requirements of this section, the Department for Local Government shall confer with and coordinate its duties and responsibilities with the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Auditor of Public Accounts. The Department for Local Government shall also confer with those state universities whose mission statements mandate their participation in the training of public officials, the state associations for those officials listed in subsection (1) of this section, and the Kentucky Association of Counties, respecting the implementation of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 383, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 13, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 69, § 55, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 562, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 69, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 8, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.027.
Orientation and continuing education training for planning and zoning officials and staff.

Each planning commissioner and board of adjustment member of a planning unit shall, within one (1) year prior to appointment, or within one hundred twenty (120) days of appointment, attend a minimum of four (4) hours of orientation training in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subsection (4) of this section.
(1) (a)

Each planning commissioner and board of adjustment member of a planning unit shall, within one (1) year prior to appointment, or within one hundred twenty (120) days of appointment, attend a minimum of four (4) hours of orientation training in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subsection (4) of this section.

Each planning professional, zoning administrator, and administrative official, and each planning professional’s deputies and assistants, shall, within one (1) year prior to being employed, or within one hundred twenty (120) days of employment, attend a minimum of eight (8) hours of orientation training in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subsection (4) of this section.

Each of the individuals listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall certify his or her attendance by a written statement filed with the secretary of his or her respective planning commission within one hundred forty (140) days of appointment or employment. Each statement shall identify the date of each program attended, its subject matter, location, sponsors, and the time spent in each program.

Each planning commissioner and board of adjustment member of a planning unit shall, within each period of two (2) consecutive calendar years, starting at the date of the individual’s appointment, attend no less than eight (8) hours of continuing education in any of the subjects listed in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) (a)

Each planning commissioner and board of adjustment member of a planning unit shall, within each period of two (2) consecutive calendar years, starting at the date of the individual’s appointment, attend no less than eight (8) hours of continuing education in any of the subjects listed in subsection (4) of this section.

Each planning professional, zoning administrator, and administrative official, and each planning professional’s deputies and assistants, shall, within each period of two (2) consecutive calendar years, starting at the date of the individual’s appointment, attend no less than sixteen (16) hours of continuing education in any of the subjects listed in subsection (4) of this section.

Each of the individuals listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall certify his or her attendance by a written statement filed with the secretary of his or her respective planning commission by December 31 of each calendar year. Each statement shall identify the date of each program attended, its subject matter, location, sponsors, and the time spent in each program.

The planning commission or the legislative body of the city, county, urban-county, charter county government, or consolidated local government in which the planning commission has jurisdiction or, in the case of a joint planning unit, has representation in, shall be responsible for providing training as required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section or for providing funding to each planning commissioner, board of adjustment member, full-time planning professional, zoning administrator, administrative official, and planning professional’s deputies or assistants so that each individual may obtain training as required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section from other sources.

The subjects for the education required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following: land use planning; zoning; floodplains; transportation; community facilities; ethics; public utilities; wireless telecommunications facilities; parliamentary procedure; public hearing procedure; administrative law; economic development; housing; public buildings; building construction; land subdivision; and powers and duties of the board of adjustment. Other topics reasonably related to the duties of planning officials or planning professionals may be approved by majority vote of the planning commission prior to December 31 of the year for which credit is sought.

Each local planning commission shall keep in its official public records originals of all statements and the written documentation of attendance required in subsection (6) of this section filed with the secretary of the planning commission pursuant to subsections (1)(c) and (2)(c) of this section for three (3) years after the calendar year in which each statement and appurtenant written documentation is filed.

Each planning commissioner, board of adjustment member, full-time planning professional, zoning administrator, administrative official, and planning professional’s deputies or assistants shall be responsible for obtaining written documentation signed by a representative of the sponsor of any continuing education course for which credit is claimed, acknowledging the fact that the individual attended the program for which credit is claimed. That documentation shall be filed with the secretary of the planning commission as attachments to the statements required by subsections (1)(c) and (2)(c) of this section.

If a planning commissioner or board of adjustment member fails to:

Complete the requisite number of hours of orientation training and continuing education within the time allotted under subsections (1) and (2) of this section;

File the statement required by subsections (1)(c) and (2)(c) of this section; or

File the documentation required by subsection (6) of this section;

No city, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, planning commission, board of adjustment, or any entity performing local planning under KRS Chapter 100, shall employ a planning professional, zoning administrator, administrative official, or a planning professional’s deputy or assistant, who fails to complete the requisite number of hours of orientation and continuing education required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section in the capacity of a planning professional, zoning administrator, administrative official, or planning professional’s deputy or assistant.

the planning commissioner shall be subject to removal from office according to the provisions of KRS 100.157, and the board of adjustment member shall be subject to removal according to the provisions of KRS 100.217.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 50, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

147A.028.
Public purpose — Local government parks and recreational facilities fund established — Distribution of funds by commissioner.

In enacting a parks establishment aid law, it is the intention of the General Assembly to supplement local efforts to establish park and recreational facilities. The inadequacy of present facilities and the high cost of acquisition and establishment of park recreational facilities are hereby declared to be matters of public interest and concern and vital to the promotion of the health, welfare, and industrial development of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth.

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall cause to be established in the Treasury a special fund to be known as the local government parks and recreational facilities fund, to be administered by the commissioner. The fund shall be comprised of grants, contributions, appropriations, and intergovernmental transfers. Moneys in the fund shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year.

The commissioner may, when he determines that a proposed local government plan for a park or other recreational facility would serve the public interest, use moneys from the local government parks and recreational facilities fund to aid local governmental units in their acquisition and establishment of local parks and recreational facilities, provided that local governmental units must provide matching funds for the project. The Department for Local Government may grant an amount up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for any one (1) project, which amount shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the entire project. For the purposes of this section, local governmental units shall mean county governments, urban-county government, and governments of cities of any class. Title to parks and recreational facilities acquired by the use of funds authorized by this section shall vest in the local governmental unit which proposed the project and provided the matching funds.

In September of each year, the commissioner shall determine the amount of funds available for distribution by December 31 of that same year. The commissioner may prescribe standards for determining the amounts to be granted for local projects and any administrative regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. Funds granted by the Department for Local Government shall be spent by the local governing authorities only for the acquisition and establishment of parks and recreational facilities or major improvements or additions to existing parks and shall not be used for operating or maintenance expenses.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 162, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 69, § 56, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 597, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 70, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 9, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.029.
Disbursement of funds for Local Match Participation Program.

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall administer and determine the disbursement of funds for the Local Match Participation Program.

Funds appropriated for the Local Match Participation Program may be used as matching funds by local governments for flood-related projects and straight sewage pipe removal projects with:

The United States Army Corps of Engineers;

The Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA); and

Other federal government grant and loan programs requiring local matching funds.

Any general fund appropriations made for the Local Match Participation Program may be used for flood control planning and mitigation activities and straight sewage pipe removal and mitigation activities.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 187, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 331, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 71, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 10, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.030.
Duties of executive department for finance and administration. [Repealed.]

147A.031.
Procedures for solid waste management conflict resolution.

The Department for Local Government, in cooperation with cities, counties, waste management districts, waste industries, and the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall develop procedures designed to resolve conflicts resulting from municipal solid waste management facility siting and operation. The procedures shall address:

Resolution of conflicts associated with multijurisdictional municipal solid waste management facilities, including the use of such techniques as negotiation, mediation, or arbitration to address issues, including but not limited to host community compensation and collection and disposal fees; and

Resolution of issues, except those relating to permit conditions imposed by the cabinet, resulting from municipal solid waste management facility siting and operation, including the use of such techniques as negotiation, mediation, or arbitration to address concerns of those persons and landowners who are directly affected by the facility’s location and operation. Issues which may be addressed include but are not limited to the following:

Operational issues, such as hours of operation;

Recycling and composting efforts that may be implemented;

Protection of property values;

Traffic routing and road maintenance; and

Establishment of local advisory committees.

The Department for Local Government shall adopt administrative regulations to implement the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abridge any rights or remedies provided by KRS Chapters 109 and 224, or at common law.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 10, effective February 26, 1991; 1998, ch. 69, § 57, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 72, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 136, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 117, § 11, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

147A.032.
Industrial revenue bond information clearinghouse.

As used in this section, “department” means the Department for Local Government.

The department may, to the extent resources are available, establish an industrial revenue bond information clearinghouse to serve as a central statewide point of contact for the dissemination of information and guidance relating to the issuance and use of industrial revenue bonds by units of local government.

The clearinghouse shall collect and disseminate information and guidance that may be adopted by units of local government seeking to issue industrial revenue bonds, including:

Identification of best practices;

Model ordinances and resolutions;

Proper issuance procedures;

Examples of possible uses of industrial revenue bond proceeds; and

Other model guidelines.

Information provided through the clearinghouse shall be published on a Web site that is accessible to the general public to assist private sector businesses, nonprofit organizations, and others that may benefit from the issuance of industrial revenue bonds.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Cabinet for Economic Development, and the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall assist the department, as needed, in the development of the clearinghouse, to ensure the most complete, accurate, and current information relating to the issuance and possible uses of industrial revenue bonds is available on the Web site.

After the initial development of the clearinghouse is complete, and for as long as it is available, a link to the Web site shall be made available on the one-stop business portal established in KRS 14.250.

History.
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 131, § 8, effective July 15, 2014.

147A.040.
Executive department for finance and administration — Divisions — Duties. [Repealed.]